Georgia, session 2025_26, HB654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 654
- 1 -

LC 46 1138
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 24 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding insurance, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"33-24-59.34.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'health benefit plan' means any individual or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued, delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state which provides major medical benefits by a healthcare corporation,
health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, accident and sickness
insurer, fraternal benefit society, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation,
or other insurer or similar entity.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, neither an insurer nor a
third-party administrator shall condition the payment of any benefit for a medical test or
procedure or for a prescription drug upon any preapproval, prior authorization, or
precertification of any kind by an insurer if such test, procedure, or prescription drug is
otherwise covered under the health benefit plan and such medical test, procedure, or
prescription drug has been prescribed by licensed healthcare provider."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 64 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to regulation and
licensure of pharmacy benefit managers, is amended by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"33-64-14.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'health benefit plan' means any individual or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued, delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state which provides major medical benefits by a healthcare corporation,
health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, accident and sickness
H. B. 654
- 2 -

LC 46 1138
insurer, fraternal benefit society, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation,
or other insurer or similar entity.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a pharmacy benefit manager
shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a prescription drug upon any
preapproval, prior authorization, or precertification of any kind by such pharmacy benefit
manager, insurer, or purchaser if such prescription drug is otherwise covered under the
health benefit plan and such drug has been prescribed by a licensed healthcare provider."
SECTION 3.
Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical practice, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"43-34-49.
No physician shall be required to obtain preapproval, prior authorization, or precertification
from an insurer with regard to the healthcare of his or her patients."
SECTION 4.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to state employees' health insurance plan, is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
"45-18-4.2.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'health benefit plan' means any individual or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued, delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state which provides major medical benefits by a healthcare corporation,
health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, accident and sickness
insurer, fraternal benefit society, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation,
or other insurer or similar entity.
H. B. 654
- 3 -

LC 46 1138
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the health insurance plan
established pursuant to this article shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a
medical test or procedure or for a prescription drug upon any preapproval, prior
authorization, or precertification of any kind if such test, procedure, or prescription drug
is otherwise covered under such plan and is prescribed by a licensed healthcare provider."
SECTION 5.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall apply to all health benefit plans issued, delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 654
- 4 -